Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-676
Health care data analysis section; established.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall establish a health care data analysis section to conduct data and research initiatives in order to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of health care in Nebraska.

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 122;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 855;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 745.